Hawaii statutes.
[§127A-13] Additional powers in an
emergency period. (a) In the event of a state of emergency declared by
the governor pursuant to [section] 127A-14, the governor may exercise the
following additional powers pertaining to emergency management during the
emergency period:

(1) Provide for and require the quarantine or
segregation of persons who are affected with or believed to have been exposed
to any infectious, communicable, or other disease that is, in the governor's
opinion, dangerous to the public health and safety, or persons who are the
source of other contamination, in any case where, in the governor's opinion,
the existing laws are not adequate to assure the public health and safety;
provide for the care and treatment of the persons; supplement the provisions of
sections 325-32 to 325-38 concerning compulsory immunization programs; provide
for the isolation or closing of property which is a source of contamination or
is in a dangerous condition in any case where, in the governor's opinion, the existing
laws are not adequate to assure the public health and safety, and designate as
public nuisances acts, practices, conduct, or conditions that are dangerous to
the public health or safety or to property; authorize that public nuisances be
summarily abated and, if need be, that the property be destroyed, by any police
officer or authorized person, or provide for the cleansing or repair of
property, and if the cleansing or repair is to be at the expense of the owner,
the procedure therefor shall follow as nearly as may be the provisions of
section 322-2, which shall be applicable; and further, authorize without the
permission of the owners or occupants, entry on private premises for any such
purposes;

(2) Relieve hardships and inequities, or obstructions
to the public health, safety, or welfare, found by the governor to exist in the
laws and to result from the operation of federal programs or measures taken
under this chapter, by suspending the laws, in whole or in part, or by
alleviating the provisions of laws on such terms and conditions as the governor
may impose, including licensing laws, quarantine laws, and laws relating to
labels, grades, and standards;

(3) Suspend any law that impedes or tends to impede
or be detrimental to the expeditious and efficient execution of, or to conflict
with, emergency functions, including laws which by this chapter specifically
are made applicable to emergency personnel;

(4) In the event of disaster or emergency beyond
local control, or an event which, in the opinion of the governor, is such as to
make state operational control necessary, or upon request of the local entity,
assume direct operational control over all or any part of the emergency
management functions within the affected area;

(5) Shut off water mains, gas mains, electric power
connections, or suspend other services, and, to the extent permitted by or
under federal law, suspend electronic media transmission;

(6) Direct and control the mandatory evacuation of
the civilian population;

(7) Exercise additional emergency functions to the
extent necessary to prevent hoarding, waste, or destruction of materials,
supplies, commodities, accommodations, facilities, and services, to effectuate
equitable distribution thereof, or to establish priorities therein as the
public welfare may require; to investigate; and notwithstanding any other law
to the contrary, to regulate or prohibit, by means of licensing, rationing, or
otherwise, the storage, transportation, use, possession, maintenance,
furnishing, sale, or distribution thereof, and any business or any transaction
related thereto;

(8) Suspend section 8-1, relating to state holidays,
except the last paragraph relating to holidays declared by the president, which
shall remain unaffected, and in the event of the suspension, the governor may
establish state holidays by proclamation;

(9) Adjust the hours for voting to take into
consideration the working hours of the voters during the emergency period, and
suspend those provisions of section 11-131 that fix the hours for voting, and
fix other hours by stating the same in the election proclamation or notice, as
the case may be;

(10) Assure the continuity of service by critical
infrastructure facilities, both publicly and privately owned, by regulating or,
if necessary to the continuation of the service thereof, by taking over and
operating the same; and

(11) Except as provided in section 134-7.2, whenever
in the governor's opinion, the laws of the State do not adequately provide for
the common defense, public health, safety, and welfare, investigate, regulate,
or prohibit the storage, transportation, use, possession, maintenance,
furnishing, sale, or distribution of, as well as any transaction related to,
explosives, firearms, and ammunition, inflammable materials and other objects,
implements, substances, businesses, or services of a hazardous or dangerous
character, or particularly capable of misuse, or obstructive of or tending to
obstruct law enforcement, emergency management, or military operations,
including intoxicating liquor and the liquor business; and authorize the
seizure and forfeiture of any such objects, implements, or substances
unlawfully possessed, as provided in this chapter.

(b) In the event of a local state of emergency
declared by the mayor pursuant to [section] 127A-14, the mayor may exercise the
following additional powers pertaining to emergency management during the
emergency period:

(1) Relieve hardships and inequities, or obstructions
to the public health, safety, or welfare, found by the mayor to exist in the
laws of the county and to result from the operation of federal programs or
measures taken under this chapter, by suspending the county laws, in whole or
in part, or by alleviating the provisions of county laws on such terms and
conditions as the mayor may impose, including county licensing laws, and county
laws relating to labels, grades, and standards;

(2) Suspend any county law that impedes or tends to
impede or be detrimental to the expeditious and efficient execution of, or to
conflict with, emergency functions, including laws which by this chapter
specifically are made applicable to emergency personnel;

(3) Shut off water mains, gas mains, electric power
connections, or suspend other services; and, to the extent permitted by or
under federal law, suspend electronic media transmission;

(4) Direct and control the mandatory evacuation of
the civilian population; and

(5) Exercise additional emergency functions, to the
extent necessary to prevent hoarding, waste, or destruction of materials,
supplies, commodities, accommodations, facilities, and services, to effectuate
equitable distribution thereof, or to establish priorities therein as the
public welfare may require; to investigate; and any other county law to the
contrary notwithstanding, to regulate or prohibit, by means of licensing,
rationing, or otherwise, the storage, transportation, use, possession,
maintenance, furnishing, sale, or distribution thereof, and any business or any
transaction related thereto. [L 2014, c 111, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next